lexd/lexicons/verb_npst_f_3sg.lexd
LEXICON LexiconVerbNpstF3sg
wиройд                   # расплетаться; распарываться
биδовд                   # закрываться (напр., о глазах, рте)
палт                     # несильно гореть, теплиться; поблескивать, блестеть, мерцать; слабо видеть (о глазах)
